Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 81. Nursing Education

§§ 2631-2634.
Repealed.
1965, No. 198, § 12.

§ 2635.
School of Nursing.

The Board of Trustees of Vermont State Colleges may establish a School of Nursing leading to an associate in science degree if in its judgment the school would serve to alleviate the shortage of nurses in Vermont and to provide for their professional education.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 274

, § 1, eff. Aug. 1, 1961; amended

1963, No. 8

, eff. March 12, 1963.